Wisconsin, session 2025, AB534.
do enact as follows:AB534,11Section 1. 6.28 (1) (b) of the statutes is amended to read:AB534,2,1126.28 (1) (b) All applications for registration corrections and additions may be 3made throughout the year at the office of the city board of election commissioners, 4at the office of the municipal clerk, at the office of the county clerk, or at other 5locations provided by the board of election commissioners or the common council in 6cities over 500,000 population or by either or both the municipal clerk, or the 7common council, village or town board in all other municipalities and may also be 8made during the school year at any high school by qualified persons under sub. (2m) 9(a). An elector who wishes to obtain a confidential listing under s. 6.47 (2) shall 10register at the office of the municipal clerk of the municipality where the elector 11resides.AB534,212Section 2. 6.28 (2m) of the statutes is created to read:AB534,2,14136.28 (2m) At high schools. (a) Public high schools shall be used for 14registration for enrolled students and members of the high school staff.AB534,3,1615(b) The municipal clerk of each municipality shall notify the school board of 16each school district in which the municipality is located that high schools shall be 17used for registration pursuant to par. (a). The school board and the municipal clerk 1shall agree upon the appointment of at least one qualified elector at each high 2school as a special school registration deputy. The municipal clerk shall appoint 3such person as a school registration deputy and explain the person’s duties and 4responsibilities. Students and staff may register at the high school on any day that 5classes are regularly held. The school registration deputies shall promptly forward 6properly completed registration forms to the municipal clerk of the municipality in 7which the registering student or staff member resides. The municipal clerk, upon 8receiving such registration forms, shall add all those registering electors who have 9met the registration requirements to the registration list. The municipal clerk may 10reject any registration form and shall promptly notify the person whose registration 11is rejected of the rejection and the reason therefor. A person whose registration is 12rejected may reapply for registration if he or she is qualified. The form of each high 13school student who is qualified and will be eligible to vote at the next election shall 14be filed in such a way that when a student attains the age of 18 years the student is 15registered to vote automatically. Each school board shall assure that the principal 16of every high school communicates elector registration information to students.AB534,4,217(c) The principal of any private high school or of any tribal school, as defined 18in s. 115.001 (15m), that operates high school grades that has a substantial number 19of students residing in a municipality may request the municipal clerk to appoint a 20special school registration deputy in accordance with par. (b). Students and staff 21may register at the high school on any day that classes are regularly held. The clerk 22shall appoint a special school registration deputy in the high school if the clerk 1determines the school to have a substantial number of students residing in the 2municipality.AB534,4,33